Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB601.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 214.452 is amended to read as follows:
The following policies shall apply to blood establishments and to donors of blood:
(1) All blood establishments within the Commonwealth shall be licensed by the United
States Food and Drug Administration and remain in compliance with all applicable
federal regulations. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, under
administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, establish
fees necessary to cover the cost of and adhere to a schedule for regular inspection,
by the Office of the Inspector General of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services, of all blood establishments within the Commonwealth to ascertain
whether each blood establishment is licensed and in compliance with KRS 214.450
to 214.464 and KRS 214.468. The Office of the Inspector General shall commence
its inspection program of blood establishments no later than September 1, 1994.
(2) All blood establishments shall test blood for the human immunodeficiency virus
and for any known causative agent for any blood-borne communicable disease,
using tests approved and required, for purposes of blood donation, by the United
States Food and Drug Administration.
(3) It shall be the duty of the administrator of any blood establishment which collects
blood for the purpose of distributing to another health service, health facility, or
health-care provider the blood for transfusion to:
(a) Secure donor consent and a signed written risk factor history and donor
consent form for each potential paid or volunteer donor for the purpose of
determining if the potential donor:
1. Is at high risk for infection with the human immunodeficiency virus;[, or
]
2. Has tested confirmatory positive for infection with the human
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1766
immunodeficiency virus;[ or ]
3. Has acquired immune deficiency syndrome;[ or ]
4. Has tested confirmatory positive for infection with any causative agent
for acquired immune deficiency syndrome recognized by the United
States Centers for Disease Control;[ or ]
5. Has a blood-borne communicable disease; or
6. Has received a COVID-19 vaccine;
(b) Provide a means for a potential donor to self-elect not to donate blood;
(c) Refuse donation or sale of blood by persons at high risk for infection with the
human immunodeficiency virus, or who have been medically diagnosed as
having acquired immune deficiency syndrome, or who have tested
confirmatory positive for infection with the human immunodeficiency virus,
or who have a blood-borne communicable disease; and
(d) Post a sign in the blood establishment which is visible to all potential donors
and which states: "Persons with acquired immune deficiency syndrome
(AIDS), or who have tested confirmatory positive for infection with the
human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), or who have a blood-borne
communicable disease or who have one (1) or more risk factors for the human
immunodeficiency virus as determined by the United States Centers for
Disease Control, are prohibited by law from donating or selling blood.
Persons violating the law are guilty of a Class D felony. ASK STAFF OF
THIS BLOOD ESTABLISHMENT."
(4) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to impose requirements which
are in conflict with donor eligibility requirements set out in United States Food and
Drug Administration or American Association of Blood Banks standards.
Section 2. KRS 214.458 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each unit of blood collected by a blood establishment for transfusion shall be
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1766
affixed with the United States Food and Drug Administration required label
and[which includes] a donor identification number through which the following
information can be obtained:
(a) The date the blood was collected;
(b) The name of the blood establishment;
(c) A nonidentifying code representing the name of the blood donor;
(d) A blood establishment serial number for the blood;
(e) The date of laboratory testing of the blood;
(f) The name of the person and laboratory testing the blood;
(g) The laboratory test results; and
(h) Notice that the blood donor signed a statement that he or she had received a
COVID-19 vaccine.
(2) Each unit of blood received by a blood establishment or health facility within the
Commonwealth from an out-of-state blood establishment shall contain a label in
accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section and the blood
establishment or health facility shall either test the blood in accordance with the
requirements for blood establishments within the Commonwealth under the
provisions of KRS 214.452(2) or may accept documented evidence of the test
results as are required under subsection (1) of this section for blood collected within
the Commonwealth.
(3) Each laboratory testing blood for transfusion shall maintain for ten (10) years from
the date of testing, and each blood establishment shall maintain for ten (10) years
from the date of collection, a list containing the information set forth in subsection
(1) of this section.
(4) No blood may be transfused into any patient in any health facility or health service
or by any health care provider unless the unit of blood has affixed to it the label as
required under this section and the blood has tested negative for the human
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1766
immunodeficiency virus or any causative agent of AIDS and[, or] any blood-borne
communicable disease as provided under KRS 214.452.
(5) Except in an emergency, before blood is transfused into any patient, a health
facility, health service, or a health care provider shall inform the patient if the
blood donor signed a statement that he or she had received a COVID-19 vaccine.
(6) When a unit of blood is transfused, a label containing the donor identification
number required under this section shall be removed from the unit and affixed to
the patient's medical chart or the blood donor identification number for the unit of
blood shall be recorded in the patient's medical chart.
(7)[(5)] Any unit of blood not containing the label required under this section shall be
destroyed by the health facility, health service, or health care provider.
(8)[(6)] Any unit of blood testing confirmatory positive for an agent of a blood-borne
communicable disease and in the possession of a health facility, health service, or
health care provider may be donated to educational or scientific research
institutions for the purpose of scientific research only and not for transfusion.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:39 PM Jacketed